Utah statutes.
48-2c-609.   Series related provisions in operating agreement.
(1)  An operating agreement may provide for classes or groups of members or
managers associated with a series with separate rights, powers, or duties as
provided in Subsection 48-2c-606(1).
(2)  An operating agreement may provide for the future creation of additional
classes or groups of members or managers associated with a series having such
relative rights, powers, and duties as may from time to time be established,
including rights, powers, and duties senior to existing classes and groups of
members or managers associated with the series.
(3)  An operating agreement may provide for the taking of an action without
the vote or approval of any member or manager, or class or group of members or
managers, including:
(a)  an action to create a class or group of a series of interests in the
company that was not previously outstanding; and
(b)  amending the operating agreement.
(4)  An operating agreement may provide that any member or class or group of
members associated with a series has no voting rights.
(5) (a)  An operating agreement may grant to all or certain identified members
or managers, or a specified class or group of the members or managers
associated with a series, the right to vote separately or with all or any
class or group of the members or managers associated with the series, on any
matter.
(b)  Voting by members or managers associated with a series may be on a per
capita, number, financial interest, class, group, or any other basis.
